Arkansas, session 2025, SB490.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 9-27-356(k), concerning a juvenile being
ordered to register as a sex offender, is amended to read as follows:
(k) Once a juvenile is ordered to register as a sex offender, he or
she shall be subject to the registration requirements set forth in §§ 12-12-
904, 12-12-906, 12-12-908, 12-12-909, and 12-12-912, with the exception that
the circuit court may waive the two-hundred-fifty-dollar fee under § 12-12-
906.

/s/Irvin







*LJH203*
03-20-2025 14:13:04 LJH203